Utah statutes.
67-4a-705.   Certain property recovery agreements unenforceable.

Each agreement to pay compensation to recover or assist in the recovery of property reported under Section 67-4a-301 that is made within 24 months after the date payment or delivery is made under Section 67-4a-302 is unenforceable.

